Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7703
Certificate of public advantage; governing cooperative agreement; application.

Parties to a cooperative agreement may apply to the department for a certificate of public advantage governing the cooperative agreement. The application shall include an executed letter of intent signed by the parties indicating the parties' intent to proceed with a cooperative agreement if the department issues a certificate of public advantage and shall also include a narrative description of the proposed agreement, the nature and scope of the cooperation in the proposed agreement, and any consideration passing to any party under the proposed agreement. A copy of the application and copies of all additional related materials shall be submitted to the Attorney General and to the department at the same time.

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 113.